pt-BR: Material para bar: Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Cortiça; Cristal; Couro falso; Vidro; Granito; Mármore; Metal; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Liga de Zinco; Outro
pl: Materiał naczyń barowych: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Żeliwo; Ceramika; Korek; Kryształ; Skaj; Szkło; Granit; Marmur; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polipropylen (PP); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Drewno; Stop cynkowy; Pozostałe
nb: Barmateriale: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Støpejern; Keramikk; Kork; Krystall; Kunstig lær; Glass; Granitt; Marmor; Metall; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Trevirke; Sinklegering; Annen
nl: Materiaal bargerei: Acryl; Aluminium; Bamboe; Gietijzer; Keramiek; Kurk; Kristal; Kunstleer; Glas; Graniet; Marmer; Metaal; Plastic; Polypropyleen (PP); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Rubber; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Hout; Zinklegering; Andere
sl-SI: Material za barsko opremo: Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Lito železo; Keramika; Pluta; Kristal; Umetno usnje; Steklo; Granit; Marmor; Kovina; Plastika; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Les; Cinkova zlitina; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на оборудване за бар: Акрил; Алуминий; Бамбук; Чугун; Керамика; Корк; Кристал; Изкуствена кожа; Стъкло; Гранит; Мрамор; Метал; Пластмаса; Полипропилен (PP); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Каучук; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Дърво; Цинкова сплав; Други
th: วัสดุสำหรับอุปกรณ์บาร์: อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; เหล็กหล่อ; เซรามิก; ต้นคอร์ก; คริสตัล; หนังเทียม; แก้ว; หินแกรนิต; หินอ่อน; โลหะ; พลาสติก; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ยาง; ซิลิโคน; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; ไม้; โลหะสังกะสีผสม; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál barového vybavenia: Akryl; Hliník; Bambus; Liatina; Keramický; Korok; Krištáľ; Umelá koža; Sklo; Žula; Mramor; Kov; Plast; Polypropylén (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Drevo; Zliatina zinku; Iné
zh-TW: 酒具材質: 壓克力; 鋁; 竹子; 鑄鐵; 陶瓷; 軟木; 水晶; 人造皮; 玻璃; 花崗岩; 大理石; 金屬; 塑膠; 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡膠; 矽膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 木材; 鋅合金; 其他
zh-CN: 酒吧用具材质: 丙烯酸; 铝; 竹子; 铸铁; 陶瓷制品; 软木; 水晶玻璃; 人造皮革; 玻璃; 花岗岩; 大理石; 金属; 塑料; 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡胶; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 钢; 木头; 锌合金; 其他
hu: Bárkellékek anyaga: Akril; Alumínium; Bambusz; Öntöttvas; Kerámia; Parafa; Kristály; Műbőr; Üveg; Gránit; Márvány; Fém; Műanyag; Polipropilén (PP); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gumi; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Fa; Cinkötvözet; Egyéb
es: Material de los utensilios para bares: Acrílico; Aluminio; Bambú; Hierro fundido; Cerámica; Corcho; Cristal; Cuero sintético; Vidrio; Granito; Mármol; Metal; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Goma; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Madera; Aleación de zinc; Otros
da: Barudstyrsmateriale: Akryl; Aluminum; Bambus; Støbejern; Keramik; Kork; Krystal; Kunstigt læder; Glas; Granit; Marmor; Metal; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Træ; Zinklegering; Andet
cs: Materiál barového nádobí: Akrylové; Hliník; Bambus; Železná litina; Keramika; Korek; Krystal; Nepravá kůže; Sklo; Žula; Mramor; Kov; Plast; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Dřevo; Slitina zinku; Jiné
vi: Vật liệu quầy bar: Acrylic; Nhôm; Tre; Chảo gang; Gốm; Thảm gỗ bần; Pha lê; Da giả; Thủy tinh; Đá granit; Cẩm thạch; Kim loại; Nhựa; Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cao su; Silicon; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Gỗ; Hợp kim kẽm; Khác
ru: Материал барной посуды: Акрил; Алюминий; Бамбук; Чугун; Керамика; Пробка; Хрусталь; Искусственная кожа; Стекло; Гранит; Мрамор; Металл; Пластик; Полипропилен (ПП); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Резина; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Дерево; Цинковый сплав; Другое
fr: Matériel de bar: Acrylique; Aluminum; Bambou; Fonte; Céramique; Liège; Cristal; Faux cuir; Verre; Granit; Marbre; Métal; Plastique; Polypropylène (PP); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Bois; Alliage de zinc; Autre
lt-LT: Baro įrankių medžiaga: Akrilas; Aliuminis; Bambukas; Ketus; Keramika; Kamštiena; Krištolas; Dirbtinė oda; Stiklas; Granitas; Marmuras; Metalas; Plastikas; Polipropilenas (PP); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Mediena; Cinko lydinys; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal opreme za bar: Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Lijevano željezo; Keramika; Pluto; Kristal; Umjetna koža; Staklo; Granit; Mramor; Metal; Plastika; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Guma; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Drvo; Legura cinka; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material de bar: Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Cortiça; Cristal; Couro falso; Vidro; Granito; Mármore; Metal; Plástico; Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Liga de zinco; Outro
ro-RO: Material produse pentru bar: Acrilic; Aluminiu; Bamboo; Fontă; Ceramic; Plută; Cristal; Imitație de piele; Sticlă; Granit; Marmură; Metal; Plastic; Polipropilenă (PP); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Lemn; Aliaj de zinc; Altele
sv: Bartillbehör - material: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambu; Gjutjärn; Keramisk; Kork; Kristall; Fuskläder; Glas; Granit; Marmor; Metall; Plast; Polypropen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Trä; Zinklegering; Annat
ja: バーウェア素材: アクリル; アルミニウム; バンブー; 鋳鉄; セラミック; コルク; クリスタル; フェイクレザー; ガラス; 花崗岩; 大理石; 金属; プラスチック; ポリプロピレン (PP); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ゴム; シリコーン; ステンレススチール; スチール; 木材; 亜鉛合金; その他
de: Barzubehör-Material: Acryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Gusseisen; Keramik; Kork; Kristall; Kunstleder; Glas; Granit; Marmor; Metall; Kunststoff; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Gummi; Silikon; Edelstahl; Stahl; Holz; Zinklegierung; Sonstiges
fi: Baaritarvikkeet: Akryyli; Alumiini; Bambu; Valurauta; Keraaminen; Korkki; Kristalli; Keinonahka; Lasi; Graniitti; Marmori; Metalli; Muovi; Polypropeeni (PP); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Kumi; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Puu; Sinkkiseos; Muu
tr: Bar gereçleri malzemeleri: Akrilik; Alüminyum; Bambu; Dökme demir; Seramik; Mantar; Kristal; Suni deri; Cam; Granit; Mermer; Metal; Plastik; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kauçuk; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Ahşap; Çinko alaşım; Diğer
en: Barware material: Acrylic; Aluminum; Bamboo; Cast iron; Ceramic; Cork; Crystal; Faux leather; Glass; Granite; Marble; Metal; Plastic; Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rubber; Silicone; Stainless steel; Steel; Wood; Zinc alloy; Other
ko: 바웨어 소재: 아크릴; 알루미늄; 대나무; 주철; 세라믹; 코르크; 결정; 인조 가죽; 유리; 화강암; 대리석; 금속; 플라스틱; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 고무; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 목재; 아연 합금; 기타
it: Materiale da bar: Acrilico; Alluminio; Bamboo; Ghisa; Ceramica; Sughero; Cristallo; Ecopelle; Vetro; Granito; Marmo; Metallo; Plastica; Polipropilene (PP); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Legno; Lega di zinco; Altro
el: Υλικό εξοπλισμού για μπαρ: Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Χυτοσίδηρος; Κεραμικό; Φελλός; Κρύσταλλο; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Γυαλί; Γρανίτης; Μάρμαρο; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Ξύλο; Κράμα ψευδαργύρου; Άλλο